District of Columbia statutes.
31-754

Incorporation of holding company.

A mutual insurance holding company resulting from a conversion of a domestic reciprocal insurance company shall be incorporated pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 29 and shall be subject to Chapters 1, 2, and 3 of Title 29 to the extent that those provisions are not in conflict with this subchapter. The articles of incorporation and any amendments to such articles of incorporation of the mutual insurance holding company shall be subject to approval of the Commissioner and Corporation Counsel of the District in the same manner as those of an insurance company.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 5, 45 DCR 1792
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(u), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-3744.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-378 substituted “Chapter 3 of Title 29 and shall be subject to Chapters 1, 2, and 3 of Title 29” for “Chapter 1 of Title 29 (’Business Corporation Act’), and shall be subject to the provisions of the Business Corporation Act”.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.